Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Chapter 54

Energy Production Facilities

7-54-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Construct” or “construction” means the erection, building, acquisition by purchase or condemnation, alteration, reconstruction, improvement, or extension of energy production facilities, the engineering, architectural designs, plans, working drawings, specifications, procedures, and other action necessary in the construction of such facilities, and the inspection and supervision of the construction of such facilities;

“Energy production facility” means a facility for the production, conversion or transmission of energy from the controlled processing of fossil or other fuels or other sources of energy and the production of electricity, steam or other forms of energy for heating, cooling, manufacturing processes and other uses, and includes “energy recovery facilities” as defined in § 68-211-501 and includes “qualified renewable energy facilities” as defined in § 54C(d)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 54C(d)(1)); provided, that the municipality proposing to provide the financing for the qualified renewable energy facility constitutes a “qualified issuer” under § 54C(d)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 54C(d)(6)), and may include “resource recovery facilities” as defined in § 68-211-501 to the extent that the resource recovery facilities are constructed in connection with energy recovery facilities;

“Governing body” means the board or body charged by law with governing the municipality;

“Municipality” means any town, city, metropolitan government, county or power district of this state, and for all purposes except in § 7-54-103(g), means a not-for-profit corporation authorized by the laws of Tennessee to act for the benefit or on behalf of any one (1) or more of such local governmental entities;

“Person” means any and all persons, natural or artificial, including any individual, firm or association, business trust, partnership, joint venture, municipality, and public, municipal, nonprofit, or private corporation organized or existing under the laws of this state or any other state, and any governmental agency or county of this state and any department, agency, or instrumentality of the executive, legislative, and judicial branches of the federal government; provided, that as to any business trust, partnership, or joint venture in which any federal government corporation has direct, equitable or beneficial ownership, such business trust, partnership or joint venture shall not be included in the definition of “person”; and

“Solid waste” means all municipal, commercial, or industrial solid waste, garbage, rubbish, refuse, and other such similar and related materials, including, without limitation, recyclable materials when they become discarded, except those excluded by the department of environment and conservation, which will designate as “special waste” any hazardous or other waste it determines should not be processed in an energy production facility for reasons of public health or safety or because the nature of the waste is such that it is not suitable for processing in an energy production facility. In the case of any municipality operating a waste water treatment or processing facility, “solid waste” also means sludge originating from such facility to the extent such sludge is not designated as “special waste.”

Acts 1975, ch. 204, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-1331; Acts 1981, ch. 204, § 1; 1982, ch. 624, §§ 1, 2; 1983, ch. 226, § 1; 1987, ch. 250, §§ 1, 2; 2009, ch. 608, § 4.

Cross-References. Operation of energy production facilities by utility districts, §7-82-302.

Sales and use tax exemption, §67-6-322.

7-54-102. Construction, purchase, improvement and operation authorized.

A municipality has the power to construct, own, operate, or maintain within its corporate limits or within the limits of the county wherein it is located, an existing or planned energy production facility or facilities. The construction of such facility or facilities may include all necessary real and personal property, any land that may be required for an alternate means for the disposal of solid waste, rights-of-way, easements, buildings, and all other appurtenances usual to such facilities, as well as the building of all necessary means of transportation or transmission of energy and including obtaining all necessary rights-of-way or easements as necessary. A municipality also has the power to acquire, hold, use, lease, as lessor or lessee, sell or otherwise dispose of any energy production facility and to enter into agreements with any person for the operation of such facility.

Acts 1975, ch. 204, § 2; T.C.A., § 6-1332; Acts 1981, ch. 204, § 2; 1982, ch. 624, § 3.

7-54-103. Powers of municipalities — Delegation of municipal authority.

The municipality shall charge for the production of any energy for such heating, cooling or processing and may combine it with any other energy produced. In no case shall the rates charged to electric or other power utility subscribers not receiving energy from the energy production facility be increased to provide revenue for the repayment of its bonds issued for such purposes.

For the purposes of this chapter, any municipality may issue bonds for the construction of energy production facilities in the manner and subject to § 7-54-106, the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986, compiled in title 9, chapter 21, or in accordance with any other law applicable to the issuer of such bonds for such purposes; provided, that, notwithstanding any contrary provisions of any such laws, bonds issued as authorized in this subsection (b) for energy production facilities may be sold at public sale or at private sale without advertisement as the issuer of such bonds shall determine.

If such bonds or refunding bonds are issued by a not-for-profit corporation acting for the benefit of or on behalf of any one (1) or more counties, cities, towns, or local governments under this chapter, such bonds shall be sold at competitive bid or at a negotiated sale pursuant to this section. Prior to the adoption of any resolution of the board of the not-for-profit corporation authorizing the sale of bonds, notes, or other obligations or entering into any contract or other arrangement in the planning or preparation for the sale of bonds, notes, or other obligations, any such resolution or any such proposed contracts or other arrangements shall be subject to the approval of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee and shall be subject to review by the state funding board. Any resolution of the not-for-profit corporation authorizing the sale of bonds, notes, or other obligations shall only become effective upon receiving the approval of the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee and the legislative bodies of the city and the county in which such city is located for whom or on whose behalf such not-for-profit corporation is acting. This subdivision (b)(2) shall not apply to any county with a metropolitan form of government and having a population of four hundred thousand (400,000) or more, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

With respect to the construction, financing, operation, or maintenance of an energy production facility or any contract authorized by § 7-54-105(a)(3), a municipality has the power to enter into such contracts or agreements, as it shall determine to be necessary or beneficial, with any person, relating to the collection, delivery, sale, purchase, or disposal of solid waste and the output from an energy production facility, including, without limitation, output in the form of electricity, steam, fuel, residue, or otherwise. Notwithstanding any other law, any municipality or county has the power to enter into contracts or agreements with municipalities proceeding under this chapter providing for the collection, delivery, sale, purchase, or disposal of solid waste or the output from an energy production facility.

In connection with the construction, financing, operation or maintenance of an energy production facility or any contract authorized by § 7-54-105(a)(3), a municipality other than a power district is authorized to exercise exclusive jurisdiction and exclusive right to control the collection and disposal of solid waste within its boundaries. In furtherance of this subsection (d) and the energy and environmental objectives of this chapter, and title 68, chapter 211, any municipality, other than a power district, constructing, financing, operating or maintaining an energy production facility or entering into any contract authorized by § 7-54-105(a)(3), or contracting with another municipality for the disposal of solid waste in whole or in part through, or by means of, such an energy production facility, is authorized to exercise exclusive jurisdiction and exclusive right to control the collection and disposal of solid waste within its boundaries and to take all necessary action to displace competition with regulation or a monopoly public service; provided, that no county shall be authorized to exercise such jurisdiction and right within the corporate limits of any incorporated city or town or metropolitan government; and provided, further, that manufacturing firms that hold state permits to dispose of or utilize their own solid wastes on plant property on April 27, 1981, shall not be subject to this chapter except by mutual agreement between plant management and the municipality. Such jurisdiction and right to control by a municipality may be exercised by ordinance, resolution, contract or otherwise.

A municipality is authorized to establish, levy, and collect fees, rates, or charges in connection with:

The collection, delivery, sale, purchase, or disposal, whether at the site of an energy production facility, a landfill, or otherwise, of solid waste; and

The output from an energy production facility.

A municipality may pledge as security for the payment of the bonds authorized to be issued pursuant to this chapter, any revenues derived from or in connection with the construction, ownership, operation, financing, leasing or sale of any energy production facility, or the execution of any contract authorized by § 7-54-105(a)(3), including, without limitation, revenues derived from or in connection with any fees, rates, charges, contracts, or agreements in connection with the collection, delivery, sale, purchase, or disposal, whether at the site of an energy production facility, a landfill, or otherwise, of solid waste and the output from an energy production facility and may also pledge the revenues from the sale of energy to pay bonds or loans issued under any municipal or other bond authority or any other state legislation permitting energy production facilities.

Notwithstanding the limitations contained in any general statutory provisions granting municipalities the right of eminent domain or condemnation, for the purposes of this chapter, any municipality proceeding with the construction, operation, maintenance or management of an energy production facility, or executing any contract authorized by § 7-54-105(a)(3) is authorized and empowered, within its boundaries, to condemn any land, easement or rights-of-way, either on, under or above the ground, for any and all purposes necessary in connection with the construction, operation and maintenance of an energy production facility or improvement to such facility. Title to property so condemned shall be taken in the name of the municipality and may be thereafter conveyed to any not-for-profit corporation acting for or on behalf of such municipality. For purposes of this subsection (g), no county shall be authorized to exercise such right of eminent domain or condemnation within the corporate limits of any town, city or metropolitan government.

The term of any contract or agreement authorized by this chapter may extend beyond the elected term of the members of the governing body of the municipality or county involved, but in no event may such term exceed forty (40) years.

The construction, operation, jurisdiction, control, and management of any facility constructed as authorized in this section may be delegated by the municipality to any of its agencies, divisions, boards, or departments as it shall determine, and such agencies, divisions, boards, or departments are authorized, notwithstanding any of the provisions of the municipality's charter, to accept such delegation of jurisdiction, control, and management. Such functions may also be delegated by the municipality to any not-for-profit corporation acting for or on behalf of such municipality; provided, that, except in any county with a metropolitan form of government and having a population of four hundred thousand (400,000) or more, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the site selection for an energy production facility may be delegated to any such not-for-profit corporation, but shall be subject to the approval by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of the legislative bodies of the city and the county in which such city is located for whom or on whose behalf such not-for-profit corporation is acting prior to the purchase of any such site.

Any municipality or county exercising, whether jointly or severally, any authority conferred upon it by this chapter, as amended, is hereby declared to be acting in furtherance of a public or governmental purpose.

Provided, that such separation and disposition neither creates a public nuisance nor is otherwise injurious to the public health, welfare, and safety, nothing in this chapter shall prevent a person or business entity that generates or produces solid waste upon property owned, leased, or rented by such person or business entity to separate or cause to be separated recyclable materials from the solid waste while the solid waste is on such property and either to:

Maintain title to such recyclable materials for such person's or business entity's own use; or

Dispose of such recyclable materials by sale or gift.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent a person from purchasing or receiving by gift recyclable materials for processing or other use separated and disposed of in strict accordance with subsection (k).

If such functions are delegated by the municipality to any not-for-profit corporation acting for or on behalf of such municipality, such corporation shall develop a uniform accounting system conforming to generally accepted accounting principles, which system shall be subject to approval by the comptroller of the treasury.

The annual report, including financial statements, and all books of account and financial records of such not-for-profit corporation shall be subject to audit by the comptroller of the treasury. The board of such corporation may, with the prior approval of the comptroller of the treasury, engage licensed independent public accountants to perform the audits. The audit contract between the corporation and the independent public accountant shall be on contract forms prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury. The corporation shall be responsible for reimbursement of the costs of audits prepared by the comptroller of the treasury and the payment of fees for audits prepared by licensed independent public accountants. Audits and working papers prepared by independent public accountants shall be subject to review and approval by the comptroller of the treasury prior to payment. Copies of such audits shall be provided to each member of the board, the legislative bodies of the city and the county in which such city is located for whom or on whose behalf such not-for-profit corporation is acting, and the comptroller of the treasury, and shall be made available to the press.

The board of directors of the not-for-profit corporation shall develop purchasing, contracting, and personnel procedures, which shall be subject to approval by the comptroller of the treasury and the commissioner of finance and administration prior to implementation.

This subsection (m) shall not apply to any county with a metropolitan form of government and having a population of four hundred thousand (400,000) or more, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1975, ch. 204, § 3; T.C.A., § 6-1333; Acts 1981, ch. 204, §§ 3-5; 1982, ch. 624, §§ 4, 5; 1983, ch. 226, §§ 2, 6, 8; 1987, ch. 82, §§ 1-3; 1987, ch. 250, §§ 3-6; 1988, ch. 750, §§ 32, 33; 1988, ch. 908, §§ 1, 5, 7, 8; 2010, ch. 868, § 21.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

7-54-104. Procedure for option — Use of Tennessee resources.

Any municipality wishing to bring itself under any one (1) or more of the provisions of this chapter may do so by resolution or ordinance of the governing body of such municipality. Such action may be taken during any stage of the construction, acquisition, development or financing of an energy production facility and shall not be impaired or prejudiced by any previous action taken by or on behalf of such municipality.

Any not-for-profit corporation acting by or on behalf of a municipality during any stage of the construction, acquisition, development, or operation of an energy production facility is encouraged to utilize Tennessee labor, products and materials to the greatest extent possible and practical so as to promote or enhance the employment opportunities in or provide economic benefits to such municipality.

Acts 1975, ch. 204, § 4; T.C.A., § 6-1334; Acts 1987, ch. 250, §§ 7, 13.

7-54-105. Loan agreements — Contracts for leases.

In addition to the powers granted to municipalities under any other provision of this chapter and any other law, either general, special or local, a municipality other than a power district has the power to:

Enter into loan agreements with any person or persons providing for the municipality to loan the proceeds derived from the issuance of bonds pursuant to this chapter to such person or persons, to be used to pay all or part of the cost of construction of an energy production facility or facilities, and providing for the repayment and securing of such loan upon such terms and conditions as the municipality shall determine;

Issue its bonds pursuant to this chapter to make such loan or loans;

Enter into contracts or leases with any person or persons, including any other municipality owning or operating an energy production facility or executing any contract authorized by this subdivision (a)(3), for the disposal of solid waste at an energy production facility or facilities or for the lease of an energy production facility or facilities, which contracts or leases shall contain such terms and conditions as the municipality shall determine, including, without limitation, provisions whereby the municipality is obligated to make payments under such contract or lease, whether or not use or services pursuant to the contract or lease are rendered, whether or not the related energy production facility or facilities are completed, operable or operating and notwithstanding suspension, interruption, interference, reduction or curtailment of the use or services of such energy production facility or facilities; and

Indemnify and hold harmless any person in connection with the financing of an energy production facility, including, without limitation, indemnification against taxation.

Prior to entering into any loan agreement or any contract for the lease by a municipality of an energy production facility or for the disposal of solid waste at an energy production facility, such municipality shall find and determine that:

There is reasonable assurance that such person or persons have adequate resources to complete payment of the estimated cost of construction of the related energy production facility or facilities; and

Arrangements have been made for a qualified operator or operators of such energy production facility or facilities.

It is hereby found and declared that substantial benefits are to be derived from the financing by municipalities of energy production facilities. Such financings will promote the construction of energy production facilities, thereby providing a safe and sanitary means of disposing of solid waste and producing significant savings in cost of disposing of solid waste in a safe and sanitary manner.

Acts 1982, ch. 624, § 6; 1987, ch. 250, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Provisions concerning the supplemental nature of this chapter, formerly compiled in this section, have been transferred to §7-54-109.

7-54-106. Issuance of bonds — Application of U.C.C. — Exemption from taxation.

Any municipality may, from time to time, issue its bonds under this section in such principal amounts as it deems necessary to provide sufficient funds to carry out any of the purposes of this chapter, including the establishment or increase of reserves, interest accrued during construction and for such period after the estimated date of commencement of operation, but not to exceed ten (10) years, as determined to be reasonably necessary by the consulting engineer of record for the financial feasibility of the municipality's undertaking, and the payment of all other costs or expenses of the municipality incident to and necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this chapter. As used in this section, “bonds” means and includes bonds, bond anticipation notes, and all other evidences of indebtedness.

Neither the members of the governing body of the municipality nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally on the bonds.

Bonds of the municipality shall be authorized by resolution of its governing body and may be issued under such resolution or under a trust indenture or other security instrument in one (1) or more series and shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denomination or denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption, with or without premium, as such resolution, trust indenture or other security instrument may provide, and without limitation as to amounts, maturities or interest rates.

The bonds may be sold at public or private sale as the municipality may provide and at such price or prices as the municipality shall determine.

In the event that any of the officers whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such officers before the delivery of such bonds or coupons, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, as if such officers had remained in office until such delivery.

Any municipality has the power in connection with the issuance of its bonds under this section to:

Covenant as to the use of any or all of its property, real or personal;

Redeem the bonds, covenant for their redemption and provide the terms and conditions of the redemption;

Covenant as to the establishment, levy and collection of rates, fees, and charges in such amounts as the municipality shall determine;

Covenant and prescribe as to events of default and terms and conditions upon which any or all of its bonds shall become or may be declared due before maturity, as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived and as to the consequences of default and the remedies of bondholders;

Provide for and covenant as to:

The pledge of or the grant of a security interest in all or any part of the revenues derived in connection with an energy production facility;

The mortgage and pledge of any property, real or personal, constituting part of an energy production facility; or

The custody, collection, securing, investment and payment of any revenues, assets, moneys, funds or property relating to an energy production facility;

Provide for, and covenant as to, the vesting in a trustee or trustees, within or outside the state, of such properties, rights, powers and duties in trust as the municipality may determine; or

Take any other action and do all other things as may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure its bonds, or, in the absolute discretion of the municipality, may tend to make the bonds more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts or things may not be enumerated in this subsection (f); it being the intention of this subsection (f) to give the municipality power to do all things in the issuance of bonds and in the provisions for security of the bonds that are consistent with this chapter and the constitution of this state.

Any municipality may issue refunding bonds for the purpose of paying, or making an exchange for, any of its bonds issued under this chapter, at or prior to maturity or upon acceleration or redemption. Refunding bonds may be issued at such time prior to the maturity or redemption of the refunded bonds as the municipality deems to be in the public interest. The refunding bonds may be issued in amounts sufficient to pay or provide for, whether in payment or exchange, the principal of the bonds being refunded, together with any redemption premium on the bonds, any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of payment of such bonds, the expenses of issuing of the refunding bonds, the expenses of redeeming the bonds being refunded, and such reserves for debt service or other capital or current expenses from the proceeds of such refunding bonds as may be required by the resolution, trust indenture or other security instruments, under which such refunding bonds are issued. The issue of refunding bonds, the maturities and other details for the refunding bonds, the security of the refunding bonds, the rights of the holders and the rights, duties and obligations of the agency in respect of the bonds shall be governed by the provisions of this chapter relating to the issue of bonds other than refunding bonds insofar as the same may be applicable.

Whether or not any bonds issued under this section or interest coupons, if any, appertaining to the bonds would otherwise so qualify, such bonds and coupons are hereby made investment securities within the meaning and for all purposes of article 8 of the Uniform Commercial Code, compiled in title 47, chapter 8.

Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code, compiled as title 47, chapter 9, shall not apply to any pledge or security interest created or granted in connection with bonds issued under this section, nor otherwise with respect to any pledge or security interest created under this section by a municipality.

Any pledge or security interest created or granted under this section by a municipality shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge or security interest is made; moneys or property that are the subject of such pledge or security interest and then held or thereafter received by a municipality shall immediately be subject to such pledge or security interest without any physical delivery of the pledge or security interest or further act; and such pledge or security interest shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the agency, irrespective of whether or not such parties have notice of the claims. Neither the resolution, trust indenture or security instrument nor any other instrument relating to any bonds or otherwise creating or granting any such pledge or security interest need be filed or recorded in any office other than with the records of the municipality.

Bonds issued under this section, their transfer and the income from the bonds, including any gain made on the sale of the bonds, shall at all times be free from taxation by the state or any political subdivision or any department, division, commission, board, bureau, agency or instrumentality of the state or any political subdivision of the state, except for inheritance and gift taxes.

Acts 1982, ch. 624, § 7.

7-54-107. Competitive bidding laws — Exemptions.

All contracts for the construction, operation or maintenance of an energy production facility and all contracts authorized by §7-54-105(a)(3) shall be exempted from any applicable competitive bidding laws of this state that shall be applicable to a municipality, and such ordinances or resolutions of any municipality that require competitive bidding, whenever:

The governing body of a municipality shall find and determine:

It is unlikely that such exemption will encourage favoritism in the awarding of such contracts or substantially diminish competition for such contracts;

The awarding of such contracts pursuant to the exemption will result in substantial cost savings to the contracting municipality. In making such finding, the governing body of a municipality may consider the type, cost, amount of the contract, number of persons available to bid and such other factors the governing body of a municipality may deem appropriate;

That such exemption will preserve or increase employment within its boundaries or otherwise promote the local economy; or

Emergency conditions, as so determined by the governing body of a municipality, require the prompt execution of such contracts; and

The governing body of a municipality shall find and determine that the following alternative procedure should be used:

Quotations and other relevant information pertaining to the proposed contract shall be solicited through a request for proposals prepared by the municipality, which shall be spread upon the minutes and be made a public record of the municipality;

The award of such contract may be made to a responsive and responsible vendor whose proposal is determined by the proposing municipality to be the best evaluated offer resulting from negotiation and taking into consideration the relative importance of price and other evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals;

If provided in the request for proposals, the responding proposal shall be opened so as to avoid disclosure of contents to competing offerors and kept secret during the process of negotiation. However, all proposals that have been submitted shall be open for public inspection after the contract is awarded, except for trade secrets and confidential information contained in the proposals and identified as such; and

As provided in the request for proposals and under rules adopted by the municipality, discussions may be conducted with responsible offerors who submit proposals determined to be reasonably susceptible of being selected for award. Offerors must be accorded fair treatment with respect to any opportunity for discussion and revision of proposals, and revisions may be permitted after submission and before award for the purpose of obtaining the best and final offers.

Acts 1982, ch. 624, § 8; 1983, ch. 226, § 3; 1987, ch. 82, § 4; 1987, ch. 250, § 9.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

7-54-108. Bond issues and loan agreements — Referendum.

In the event that the issuance of any series of bonds or the entering into of any contract by a municipality, other than a power district, pursuant to this chapter, would constitute the giving or loaning of the credit of such municipality to or in aid of any person, company, association or corporation, or would constitute such municipality becoming a stockholder with others in any company, association or corporation, then such bonds shall not be issued or such contract shall not be entered into unless the governing body of the municipality shall, by resolution spread upon its minutes, declare its intention of issuing such bonds or entering such contract and prior to the delivery and payment for any such bonds or entering into such contract, a three-fourths (¾) majority of the registered voters of such municipality voting at an election on the special question of issuing such bonds or entering into such contract shall approve of such bond issue or contract; provided, that no such election shall be necessary in connection with the authorization of refunding bonds.

The governing body shall, by resolution, direct the county election commission to hold an election on the question of issuing the bonds or entering into such contract.

It is not necessary to submit to the voters any questions other than the maximum amount of bonds to be issued and the purpose for the bonds or the nature of the contract and the purpose for the contract, as the case may be.

It is the duty of the governing body of such municipality to enter upon its minutes the results and returns of such election, and thereafter such entry upon its minutes shall be conclusive evidence of the result of such election, and no suit, action or other proceeding contesting the validity of such election shall thereafter be entertained in any of the courts of the state.

If such election results unfavorably to the proposition, then no second or other election shall be ordered or held until the governing body shall, by resolution, determine that such election may be held.

Nothing contained in this section or other laws of the state shall be construed to prohibit or restrict municipalities from contracting with one another according to such terms as such municipalities shall agree are reasonable, necessary and appropriate to implement the purposes and intent of this chapter and other laws of the state pertaining to the collection and disposal of solid waste and the construction, operation and maintenance of energy production facilities.

Acts 1982, ch. 624, § 9; 1987, ch. 250, § 11.

7-54-109. Supplemental provisions.

This chapter shall be in addition and supplemental to any other law providing for energy facilities and shall not be deemed to amend or repeal any other law.

Acts 1975, ch. 204, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 6-1335, 7-54-105; Acts 1982, ch. 624, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. This section was formerly compiled as §7-54-105.

7-54-110. Filing of proposed ordinance or resolution — Determination by department — Report concerning implementation — Enforcement.

Any municipality, as defined in § 7-54-101, and any county that, as a part of the construction, financing, operation or maintenance of an energy production facility, or of an energy recovery facility or resource recovery facility as defined in § 68-211-501, or of a solid waste disposal system as defined in § 68-211-103, or in connection with any contract authorized by § 7-54-105(a)(3), proposes to displace competition with regulation or monopoly public service shall file with the department of environment and conservation a certified copy of its proposed ordinance or resolution and of the plans for the construction, financing, operation and maintenance of the proposed project, not less than one hundred twenty (120) days before the ordinance or resolution becomes effective.

The commissioner of environment and conservation or the commissioner's authorized representative shall, upon submission in final form, review such implementing ordinance or resolution and such plans, and, based solely upon the record before the municipality or before the county, shall determine, in the commissioner's discretion, whether they are reasonably necessary in order to achieve the energy and environmental policy objectives of this chapter and of title 68. Any such determination shall be issued before the scheduled effective date of the ordinance, resolution or plan, and absent a determination entered on or before that date declaring the ordinance, resolution or plan to be in violation of this chapter or of title 68, the ordinance, resolution or plan shall be conclusively presumed to be valid under this chapter and consistent with the policy of title 68, chapter 211.

One (1) year after the effective date of any ordinance or resolution in accordance with subsection (b) and each year thereafter during the operation of the project, the municipality or county shall file a report with the commissioner describing its implementation and administration of the ordinance or resolution. In the event that the municipality or county proposes changes to the ordinance, resolution or plans for the project, any such changes that may significantly affect the project shall be submitted to the commissioner in advance in accordance with the procedures set forth in subsections (a) and (b).

The commissioner shall interpret, apply and enforce this section on behalf of the state and may promulgate such regulations as the commissioner deems to be appropriate for its implementation.

The determination made pursuant to subsection (b) shall not exempt any facility or site from regulation by the commissioner or the Tennessee solid waste disposal control board pursuant to title 68, chapter 211 and other applicable statutes. Further, such determination shall not be construed as warranting the economic or technological feasibility of the project.

Acts 1983, ch. 226, § 7; 1987, ch. 82, § 5.

7-54-111. Solid waste recovery disposal systems — Participation by not-for-profit corporations.

Any not-for-profit corporation authorized by the laws of Tennessee to act for the benefit or on behalf of any one (1) or more counties, cities and towns pursuant to this chapter is authorized to participate in applicable approved local, joint or regional solid waste recovery disposal systems pursuant to chapter 58 of this title. When acting pursuant to chapter 58 of this title, such corporation shall have and exercise all authority granted to counties, cities, towns and local governments by the terms and provisions of such chapter.

Acts 1987, ch. 250, § 12.

7-54-112. Meetings of board — Conflicts of interest.

The members of the board of directors of a not-for-profit corporation when acting pursuant to this chapter or chapter 58 of this title are deemed to be within title 12, chapter 4, part 1, relative to conflicts of interest, and the meetings of such board shall be subject to title 8, chapter 44. This section shall not apply to any county with a metropolitan form of government and having a population of four hundred thousand (400,000) or more, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1988, ch. 908, §§ 2, 5.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

7-54-113. Appointment of local directors.

Notwithstanding any other law or charter to the contrary, the board of directors of any not-for-profit corporation acting for the benefit or on behalf of any one (1) or more counties, cities, towns or governmental entities pursuant to this chapter or chapter 58 of this title shall include two (2) directors to be appointed by the respective chief executive officer of any municipality, county, or other local government on whose behalf such corporation is acting. One (1) of such appointees shall be black. This section shall not apply to any county with a metropolitan form of government and having a population of four hundred thousand (400,000) or more, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

The persons appointed pursuant to this section shall be confirmed by the appropriate local legislative body.

Acts 1988, ch. 908, §§ 5, 6.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.